Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.070

Use of funds.

The authority may use any funds legally available to it for any purpose specifically authorized by this chapter, or for otherwise improving economic development in this state by assisting businesses and farm enterprises that do not have access to capital at terms and rates comparable to large corporations due to the location of the business, the size of the business, the lack of financial expertise, or other appropriate reasons: PROVIDED, That no funds of the state shall be used for such purposes.

[ 1990 c 53 s 4; 1989 c 279 s 8.]